Maine, session 132, LD981.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §2107-A is enacted to read:
§2107-A. Automated crime victim notification system; minimum requirements
A facility that is required by section 2106 to provide notification to a victim of a
defendant's release or escape or that is required by section 2107 to provide notification to
a victim of a defendant's release on preconviction bail and that provides such notification
using an automated crime victim notification system shall ensure that:
1. Optional use of automated system. A victim is not required to receive the
notifications under section 2106 or 2107 using the automated crime victim notification
system and may elect to receive the notification through other methods specified in section
2106 or 2107;
2. Disclosure of protected information. The automated crime victim notification
system is designed to protect from disclosure the name, contact information and any other
personally identifying information about a victim who registers to use the system except
disclosure:
A. To a sexual assault counselor, as defined in Title 16, section 53-A, subsection 1,
paragraph B;
B. To a domestic violence advocate, as defined in Title 16, section 53-B, subsection
1, paragraph A-4;
C. To a victim witness advocate, as defined in Title 16, section 53-C, subsection 1,
paragraph C; or
D. Pursuant to law, court rule, court decision or court order specifically providing for
the disclosure of such information.
The facility shall ensure that any vendor or entity it contracts with to develop, implement
or administer the system has implemented necessary policies or protocols to ensure that the
Page 1 - 132LR0739(05)

vendor or entity protects from disclosure the victim information described in this
subsection, except as specified in paragraphs A to C;
3. Policies and protocols required. The facility establishes and makes publicly
available written policies or protocols regarding the implementation and use of the
automated crime victim notification system within the facility, which must include, but are
not limited to, a plan for responding to any planned or unplanned system outages or
inaccurate notifications and the process by which the facility will address complaints
received from victims regarding the system; and
4. Staffing. Appropriate staffing is available to respond to communications from
victims regarding notifications received using the automated crime victim notification
system.
Sec. 2. Establishment of automated crime victim notification system.
County sheriffs, collectively through a statewide association of sheriffs, shall establish an
automated crime victim notification system for use in jails, county correctional facilities
and regional correctional facilities. The system under this section must be designed to
provide victims and other registrants the option of receiving automated notices of
information available to victims pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 17-A,
sections 2106 and 2107. In developing, maintaining and administering the system under
this section, the sheriffs, collectively through a statewide association of sheriffs, may
contract with an entity that develops or offers commercial, real-time automated crime
victim notification systems.
Sec. 3. Automated crime victim notification system advisory committee;
report. County sheriffs, collectively through a statewide association of sheriffs, shall
convene an automated crime victim notification system advisory committee to support,
coordinate and monitor the implementation of the automated crime victim notification
system required by section 2. The advisory committee under this section must include
representatives from a statewide association of sheriffs, a statewide coalition of domestic
violence prevention projects, a statewide coalition of sexual assault support centers and the
Office of Victim Services within the Department of Corrections; may invite the
participation of other members as appropriate; may consult with other individuals, agencies
or organizations as necessary to support its work; shall meet at least monthly; and shall, at
a minimum, review and develop findings and recommendations regarding the following
matters:
1. The resources included or proposed for inclusion in the directory of community-
based support services;
2. The gaps or challenges experienced by crime victims who may elect to register or
are registered to use the automated crime victim notification system required by section 2
as that system is implemented and refined; and
3. Any other recommendations regarding the implementation and maintenance of that
system.
On or before November 4, 2026, the sheriffs, collectively through a statewide
association of sheriffs, shall submit a report outlining the findings and recommendations
of the advisory committee to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over criminal justice and public safety matters. The report must, at a minimum,
Page 2 - 132LR0739(05)

include an overview of the implementation of the automated crime victim notification
system required by section 2, the recommendations regarding implementation of that
system made by the advisory committee, the status of the implementation of any such
recommendations and any other recommendations for further implementation and
sustainability of the system, including recommendations for addressing ongoing costs
associated with the system. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out
legislation relating to the report to the 133rd Legislature in 2027.
Sec. 4. Transfer of settlement funds. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer $140,000 from the Administration -
Attorney General, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of the
Attorney General from funds received from settlement agreements to the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2027.
Sec. 5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support activities by county sheriffs, collectively
through a statewide association of sheriffs, to develop, support and maintain an automated
crime victim notification system to be used in jails, county correctional facilities and
regional correctional facilities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $140,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $140,000
Page 3 - 132LR0739(05)